Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB416.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of December 19, 1988 (P.L.1262, No.156), known as the Local Option Small Games of Chance Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 301.2. Payment.(a) Methods.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2) and notwithstanding any other provision of law, a licensed eligible organization may accept payment via credit card, debit card, mobile payment services or other electronic 1234567891011121314151617181920 payment method for the purchase of a raffle ticket, provided that the organization:(i) employs a method to verify that the individual who buys a raffle ticket is at least 18 years of age. The organization may not accept payment from an individual under 18 years of age; and(ii) does not violate the provisions of 31 U.S.C. Ch. 53 Subch. IV (relating to prohibition on funding of unlawful Internet gambling).(2) A licensee under Chapter 9 may not accept mobile payment services for the playing of games of chance.(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Mobile payment service." A service in which a money payment is made electronically through a money transfer service . Section 2. The provisions of 61 Pa. Code § 901.506 are abrogated insofar as they are inconsistent with the addition of section 301.2 of the act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0416PN0403 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920